California, session 20252026, SB1167.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Electric bicycles not only offer a solution to car dependency and transportation poverty, but also help reduce our carbon footprint. As California moves away from its dependence on fossil fuels, we will continue to see a rise in zero-emission modes of transportation, including, but not limited to, electric bicycles.(b) Electric bicycles reduce barriers in encouraging more people to ride bicycles and play a significant factor in replacing car trips in order to meet our goals of shifting to alternative modes of transportation, reducing the number of motor vehicle miles traveled, and improving our climate.(c) Other electric cycles, including motor-driven cycles, mopeds, and “e-motos,” are not electric bicycles because of their excessive speed and power, but are designed and marketed as “e-bikes” to children on social media, and are gaining popularity. Nearly 90 percent of electric devices observed at the bicycle racks of local schools in Counties of San Mateo and Marin in 2025 were “e-motos,” not electric bicycles.(d) Many devices are being deceptively marketed as class 2 or class 3 electric bicycles and do not fit into the legal classification of either class because the equipped motor is more powerful than the legally authorized 750 watts or because the advertised and actual top assisted speed is above the legal limit of 20 or 28 miles per hour, respectively.(e) “E-motos” are causing increased safety issues on the streets of many California communities, based on evidence in a report issued by the Mineta Transportation Institute in 2025.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature to improve the safe movement and expanded usage of electric bicycles as a net-zero transportation mode in the context of California’s existing multimodal transportation system.(g) It is the intent of the Legislature to protect consumers from deceptive marketing tactics while ensuring the safety of our roadways.SEC. 2. Section 51860 of the Education Code is amended to read:51860. (a) The governing board of any school district having jurisdiction over any elementary, intermediate, junior high, or high school may provide time and facilities to any local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the schools of the district, as well as to other organizations, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 38134, or public agencies that provide bicycle, scooter, electric bicycle, motorized bicycle, moped, or motorized scooter safety instruction, for bicycle, scooter, electric bicycle, motorized bicycle, moped, or motorized scooter safety instruction.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Electric bicycle” has the same meaning as in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.(2) “Motorized bicycle” “Moped” has the same meaning as in Section 406 of the Vehicle Code.(3) “Motorized scooter” has the same meaning as in Section 407.5 of the Vehicle Code.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 26300 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:26300. For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Accredited testing laboratory” means an independent laboratory accredited by an accreditation body to ISO 17025 or ISO 17065, or a Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory (NRTL).(b) “Certification” means the attestation by an accredited testing laboratory that the equipment, device, or product has been evaluated and tested and found to conform to the standards specified in this chapter.(c) “Charging system” means dedicated chargers used for charging an electric bicycle, a powered mobility device, or storage batteries that are either in place or removed from electric bicycles or powered mobility devices for charging.(d) “Complete electrical system” means all electric components of an electric bicycle or powered mobility device, including, but not limited to, drive units, batteries, battery management systems, interconnected wiring, charging systems, and power inlets.(e) (1) “Electric bicycle” means a bicycle with electric assistance as defined in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.(2) Devices advertised as “e-bikes,” “e-bicycles,” “electric bikes,” or other variations that are substantially similar to an electric bicycle are subject to the same standards as an electric bicycle.(f) “Nationally recognized testing laboratory” (NRTL) means an organization that meets the qualifications provided in Section 1910(b) of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations and is recognized as an NRTL by the United States Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration’s (OSHA) Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory Program.(g) “Office” means the Office of the State Fire Marshal.(h) (1) “Powered mobility device” includes any either of the following:(A) A motorized scooter as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 407.5 of the Vehicle Code.(B)A motorized bicycle or moped as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 406 of the Vehicle Code.(C)An off-highway electric motorcycle as defined in Section 436.1 of the Vehicle Code.(D)(B) Any other personal mobility device powered by a lithium-ion storage battery.(2) “Powered mobility device” does not include electric bicycles, wheelchairs, or other mobility devices designed for use by persons with disabilities, a vehicle that is powered by an internal combustion engine, or a vehicle required to be registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles.(i) “Storage battery” means any of the following:(1) A rechargeable lithium-ion traction battery that supplies electrical power to the motor that propels an electric bicycle or powered mobility device, and includes a replacement original equipment traction battery for those devices.(2) A battery sold as part of a kit intended to convert a bicycle into an electric bicycle or powered mobility device.(3) A lithium-ion battery advertised as suitable for use with an electric bicycle or powered mobility device.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 26302 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:26302. (a) A person shall not distribute, sell, lease, or offer for sale or lease an electric bicycle unless the storage battery for the electric bicycle has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with a standard referenced in ANSI/CAN/UL 2849 or EN 15194, or other safety standard for electric bicycles as the office has established by rule.(b) A person shall not distribute, sell, lease, or offer for sale or lease a powered mobility device unless the battery for the powered mobility device has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL 2272, except that a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle may be certified by its manufacturer for compliance with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC electrical safety standard if the name of the manufacturer and the test standard used are permanently marked on the vehicle or on its drive system. 2272.(c) A person shall not shall not distribute, sell, lease, or offer for sale or lease a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle unless the battery for the vehicle complies with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard.(c)(d) A person shall not distribute, sell, lease, or offer for sale or lease a storage battery unless the storage battery meets either any of the following:(1) The storage battery is designed for a powered mobility device and has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL 2271 or other safety standard for powered mobility devices as the office has established by rule.(2) The storage battery is designed for an electric bicycle and has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with a battery standard referenced in ANSI/CAN/UL 2849, EN 15194, or other safety standard as the office has established by rule, or is part of a complete electrical system for an electric bicycle that has been tested by an accredited laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL 2849, EN 15194, or other safety standard as the office has established by rule.(3) The storage battery is designed for a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle, and the battery complies with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard.(d)(e) (1) Charging systems advertised, distributed, sold, leased, or offered for sale or lease for use with a particular electric bicycle, powered mobility device, or storage battery shall be certified for use with that electric bicycle, powered mobility device, or storage battery.(2) Charging systems advertised, distributed, sold, leased, or offered for sale or lease for use with mopeds or off-highway electric motorcycles shall comply with applicable requirements within SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard, and be compatible for use with the moped, off-highway electric motorcycle, or storage battery.(e)(f) (1) A person shall not distribute, sell, lease, or offer for sale or lease an electric bicycle, powered mobility device, charging system, or storage battery unless the logo, wordmark, label, or name of an accredited testing laboratory and the applicable certification standard used to show compliance is permanently affixed directly on the electric bicycle or its electrical system, the powered mobility device, the charging system, or the battery of the electric bicycle or powered mobility device.(2) A person shall not distribute, sell, lease, or offer for sale or lease a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle unless the vehicle is equipped with a permanent label or marking on the vehicle in a readily visible location stating compliance with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard, and the manufacturer retains documentation and information supporting compliance with the standard.(2)(3) A person shall not be required to display the logo, wordmark, label, or name of an accredited testing laboratory if the electric bicycle, powered mobility device, moped, off-highway electric motorcycle, charging system, or storage battery is being sold or leased secondhand.SEC. 5. Section 26303 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:26303. (a) A person shall not rent or offer for rental an electric bicycle unless the battery for the electric bicycle has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with a standard referenced in ANSI/CAN/UL 2849, EN 15194, or other safety standard for electric bicycles the office has established by rule.(b) A person shall not rent or offer for rental an electric bicycle charging system unless the charging system has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with a standard referenced in ANSI/CAN/UL 2849, EN 15194, or other safety standard for electric bicycle charging systems the office has established by rule, and, if it is being rented for use with a specific electric bicycle, it is certified for use with that electric bicycle’s battery.(c) A person shall not rent or offer for rental a powered mobility device unless the powered mobility device has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL 2272.(d) A person shall not rent or offer for rental a powered mobility device charging system unless the charging system has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL 2272 and, if it is being rented for use with a specific powered mobility device, it is certified for use with that powered mobility device’s battery.(e) A person shall not rent or offer for rental a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle unless the battery for the vehicle complies with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard.(f) A person shall not rent or offer for rental a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle charging system unless the charging system complies with applicable requirements within SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard, and is compatible for use with the moped, off-highway electric motorcycle, or storage battery.(e)(g) A person shall not rent or offer for rental a storage battery unless the storage battery meets either any of the following:(1) The storage battery is designed for a powered mobility device and has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL 2271.(2) The storage battery is designed for an electric bicycle and has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with a battery standard referenced in ANSI/CAN/UL 2849, EN 15194, or other safety standard as the office has established by rule, or is part of a complete electrical system for an electric bicycle that has been tested by an accredited laboratory for compliance with ANSI/CAN/UL 2849, EN 15194, or other safety standard as the office has established by rule.(3) The storage battery is designed for a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle, and the battery complies with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard.(f)(h) A person shall not rent or offer for rental a storage battery charging system unless the either of the following circumstances are met:(1) The charging system has been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance with a charger standard referenced in UL 2272, UL 2849, EN 15194, or other safety standard for storage battery charging systems the office has established by rule and, if it is being rented for use with a specific storage battery, it is certified for use with that storage battery.(2) The charging system complies with applicable requirements within SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC safety standard if the storage battery charging system is for use with a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle.(g)(i) A person shall not be required to display the logo, wordmark, label, or name of an accredited testing laboratory if the electric bicycle, powered mobility device, or storage battery is being rented.(h)(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 6. Section 26304 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:26304. (a) A manufacturer, importer, distributor, or retailer of an electric bicycle, powered mobility device, charging system, or storage battery used on an electric bicycle or powered mobility device, that is subject to testing under this chapter chapter, shall provide, upon request, a true and accurate copy of the test report for the product issued by the accredited testing laboratory.(b) A manufacturer, importer, distributor, or retailer of a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle, charging system, or storage battery used on a moped or off-highway electric motorcycle shall retain documentation and information supporting compliance with any standard required by this chapter.SEC. 4.SEC. 7. Section 4442 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4442. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person shall not use, operate, or allow to be used or operated, any internal combustion engine that uses hydrocarbon fuels on any forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land unless the engine is equipped with a spark arrester, as defined in subdivision (c), maintained in effective working order, or the engine is constructed, equipped, and maintained for the prevention of fire pursuant to Section 4443.(b) Spark arresters affixed to the exhaust system of engines or vehicles subject to this section shall not be placed or mounted in such a manner as to allow flames or heat from the exhaust system to ignite any flammable material.(c) A spark arrester is a device constructed of nonflammable materials specifically for the purpose of removing and retaining carbon and other flammable particles over 0.0232 of an inch in size from the exhaust flow of an internal combustion engine that uses hydrocarbon fuels or which is qualified and rated by the United States Forest Service.(d) Engines used to provide motive power for trucks, truck tractors, buses, and passenger vehicles, except motorcycles, are not subject to this section if the exhaust system is equipped with a muffler, as defined in the Vehicle Code.(e) Turbocharged engines are not subject to this section if all exhausted gases pass through the rotating turbine wheel, there is no exhaust bypass to the atmosphere, and the turbocharger is in effective mechanical condition.(f) Motor vehicles, when being operated in an organized racing or competitive event upon a closed course, are not subject to this section if the event is conducted under the auspices of a recognized sanctioning body and by permit issued by the fire protection authority having jurisdiction.(g) A person shall not use, operate, or allow to be used or operated, any off-highway electric motorcycle, or any motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped powered by an electric motor, on any forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land unless the vehicle has been certified by its manufacturer for compliance with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC electrical safety standard and the name of the manufacturer and the test standard used are permanently marked on the vehicle or on its drive system.SEC. 5.SEC. 8. Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:312.5. (a) An “electric bicycle” or “e-bike” is a bicycle equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor that does not exceed 750 watts of power.(1) A “class 1 electric bicycle,” or “low-speed pedal-assisted electric bicycle,” is a bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, that is not capable of exclusively propelling the bicycle, except as provided in paragraph (4), that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour, and that is not capable of providing assistance to reach speeds greater than 20 miles per hour.(2) A “class 2 electric bicycle,” or “low-speed throttle-assisted electric bicycle,” is a bicycle equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle, and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour.(3) A “class 3 electric bicycle,” or “speed pedal-assisted electric bicycle,” is a bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, that is not capable of exclusively propelling the bicycle, except as provided in paragraph (4), and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 28 miles per hour, and equipped with a speedometer.(4) A class 1 or class 3 electric bicycle may have start assistance or a walk mode that propels the electric bicycle on motor power alone, up to a maximum speed of 3.7 miles per hour.(b) A person riding an electric bicycle, as defined in this section, is subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 21200) of Chapter 1 of Division 11.(c) The following vehicles are not electric bicycles under this code and shall not be advertised, sold, offered for sale, or labeled as electric bicycles or “e-bikes:”(1) A vehicle with motor power of more than 750 watts.(2) A vehicle capable of attaining a speed greater than 20 miles per hour on motor power alone.(3) A vehicle with a motor capable of providing assistance when the vehicle reaches a speed exceeding 28 miles per hour.(4) A vehicle with no more than three wheels powered by an electric motor that is intended by the manufacturer to be modifiable to do any of the following:(A) Attain more than 750 watts of power.(B) Attain a speed greater than 20 miles per hour on motor power alone.(C) Provide assistance when the vehicle reaches a speed exceeding 28 miles per hour.(5) A vehicle without operable pedals.(6) Any motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, moped, motorized scooter, off-highway electric motorcycle, pocket bike, or recreational off-highway vehicle.(d)In addition to any penalties imposed under this code, advertising or selling a device listed in subdivision (c) as an “e-bike” or any class of electric bicycle shall constitute a misleading statement within the meaning of Sections 17200 and 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.SEC. 6.SEC. 9. Section 405 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:405. (a) (1) A “motor-driven cycle” is any motorcycle propelled by an internal combustion engine that displaces less than 150 cubic centimeters, or by an electric motor that produces 5 gross brake horsepower (3,750 watts) or less, and is designed for highway use, complies use.(2) A motor-driven cycle shall comply with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards contained in Part 571 (commencing with Section 571.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any successor regulation, has have a 17-digit vehicle identification number and a safety certification label, as required in Parts 565 (commencing with Section 565.1) and 567 (commencing with Section 567.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and is be equipped in accordance with the requirements of this code. A motor-driven cycle does not include a moped.(b) An electric bicycle, moped, motorized scooter, pocket bike, or recreational off-highway vehicle is not a motor-driven cycle and shall not be advertised, sold, offered for sale, or labeled as a motor-driven cycle.(c)In addition to any penalties imposed under this code, advertising or selling a motor-driven cycle as an “e-bike” or any class of electric bicycle shall constitute a misleading statement within the meaning of Sections 17200 and 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.SEC. 7.SEC. 10. Section 406 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:406. (a) (1) A “moped” is a two-wheeled or three-wheeled device that has an electric motor or an internal combustion engine that produces less than 4 gross brake horsepower (3,000 watts), is capable of propelling the device at a maximum speed of not more than 30 miles per hour on level ground, is designed for highway use, complies use.(2) A moped shall comply with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards contained in Part 571 (commencing with Section 571.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, has have a 17-digit vehicle identification number and a safety certification label, as required in Parts 565 (commencing with Section 565.1) and 567 (commencing with Section 567.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and is be equipped in accordance with the requirements of this code.(2)(3) An electric bicycle, motor-driven cycle, motorized scooter, pocket bike, or off-highway electric motorcycle is not a moped, and shall not be advertised, sold, offered for sale, or labeled as a moped.(3)(4) A moped may be equipped with operable pedals for propulsion by human power.(b)In addition to any penalties imposed under this code, advertising or selling a moped as an “e-bike” or any class of electric bicycle shall constitute a misleading statement within the meaning of Sections 17200 and 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.(c)(b) A moped is formerly also referred to as a “motorized bicycle.”SEC. 11. Section 407.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:407.5. (a) A “motorized scooter” is any two-wheeled device that has handlebars, has either a floorboard that is designed to be stood upon when riding or a seat and footrests in place of the floorboard, and is powered by an electric motor. This device may also be designed to be powered by human propulsion. For purposes of this section, a motorcycle, as defined in Section 400, a motor-driven cycle, as defined in Section 405, or a motorized bicycle or moped, as defined in Section 406, is not a motorized scooter.(b) A device meeting the definition in subdivision (a) that is powered by a source other than electrical power is also a motorized scooter.(c) (1) A manufacturer of motorized scooters shall provide a disclosure to buyers that advises buyers that the buyers’ existing insurance policies may not provide coverage for these scooters and that the buyers should contact their insurance company or insurance agent to determine if coverage is provided.(2) The disclosure required under paragraph (1) shall meet both of the following requirements:(A) The disclosure shall be printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a single sheet of paper that contains no information other than the disclosure.(B) The disclosure shall include the following language in capital letters:“YOUR INSURANCE POLICIES MAY NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR ACCIDENTS INVOLVING THE USE OF THIS SCOOTER. TO DETERMINE IF COVERAGE IS PROVIDED, YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY OR AGENT.”(d) (1) A manufacturer of motorized scooters shall provide a disclosure to a buyer that advises the buyer that the buyer may not modify or alter the exhaust system to cause that system to amplify or create an excessive noise, or to fail to meet applicable emission requirements.(2) The disclosure required under paragraph (1) shall meet both of the following requirements:(A) The disclosure shall be printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a single sheet of paper that contains no information other than the disclosure.(B) The disclosure shall include the following language in capital letters:“YOU MAY NOT MODIFY OR ALTER THE EXHAUST SYSTEM OF THIS SCOOTER TO CAUSE IT TO AMPLIFY OR CREATE EXCESSIVE NOISE PER VEHICLE CODE SECTION 21226, OR TO FAIL TO MEET APPLICABLE EMISSION REQUIREMENTS PER VEHICLE CODE 27156.”SEC. 8.SEC. 12. Section 426 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:426. “New motor vehicle dealer” is a dealer who, in addition to the requirements of that section, either acquires for resale new and unregistered motor vehicles from manufacturers or distributors of those motor vehicles or acquires for resale new off-highway motorcycles, off-highway electric motorcycles, or all-terrain vehicles from manufacturers or distributors of the vehicles. A distinction shall not be made, nor any different construction be given to the definition of “new motor vehicle dealer” and “dealer” except for the application of the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 2 and Sections 4456, 4750.6, and 11704.5. Sections 3001 and 3003 do not, however, apply to a dealer who deals exclusively in motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, or recreational vehicles, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 9.SEC. 13. Section 472 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:472. A “pilot car” is a motor vehicle, except a motorcycle, moped, or motorized quadricycle, which is used to escort one or more other vehicles, when required, due to the vehicles’ size or character of load, in accordance with conditions set forth in a permit issued by the appropriate state agency or by a local authority.SEC. 10.SEC. 14. Section 672 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:672. (a) “Vehicle manufacturer” is any person who produces from raw materials or new basic components a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, off-highway motorcycles, off-highway electric motorcycles, or all-terrain vehicles subject to identification under this code, or trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1, or who permanently alters, for purposes of retail sales, new commercial vehicles by converting the vehicles into house cars that display the insignia of approval required by Section 18056 of the Health and Safety Code and any regulations issued pursuant thereto by the Department of Housing and Community Development. As used in this section, “permanently alters” does not include the permanent attachment of a camper to a vehicle.(b) A vehicle manufacturer that produces a vehicle of a type subject to registration that consists of used or reconditioned parts, for the purposes of the code, is a remanufacturer, as defined in Section 507.8.(c) Unless a vehicle manufacturer either grants franchises to franchisees in this state, or issues vehicle warranties directly to franchisees in this state or consumers in this state, the manufacturer shall have an established place of business or a representative in this state.(d) The scope and application of this section are limited to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1500) and Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100).SEC. 11.SEC. 15. Section 4020 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:4020. A moped operated upon a highway is exempt from registration.SEC. 12.SEC. 16. The heading of Article 8.1 (commencing with Section 5030) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read: Article 8.1. MopedsSEC. 13.SEC. 17. Section 5030 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5030. A moped is required to display a special license plate issued by the department.SEC. 14.SEC. 18. Section 5031 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5031. An application by a person other than a manufacturer or dealer for a license plate for a moped shall include all the following:(a) The true, full name and the driver’s license or identification card number, if any, of the owner.(b) A description of the moped, including any distinctive marks or features.(c) Other information as may reasonably be required by the department to determine whether a license plate shall be issued for the moped.SEC. 15.SEC. 19. Section 5032 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5032. (a) The application for a special license plate for a moped shall be made before the moped is operated or moved upon a highway, except that, upon the retail sale of a moped when there is no license plate, the operator may operate the moped for a period of five days from and including the date of sale, at which time application shall be made to the department for a special license plate. If the fifth day should fall on Saturday, Sunday, or a holiday, the application shall be made on the first business day thereafter.(b) The five-day operating provision set forth in subdivision (a) shall apply only if the operator has in their immediate possession evidence that the moped was purchased within the last five days including the date of sale.SEC. 16.SEC. 20. Section 5033 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5033. Upon proper application and payment of the fees specified in Section 5036, the department shall issue a special license plate and an identification card for the moped for which application was made. Applications may be submitted by mail unless the department determines that it is not feasible to complete the identification process by such method.SEC. 17.SEC. 21. Section 5034 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5034. (a) The department may issue a special license plate or other suitable device to a manufacturer or dealer of mopeds upon payment of the fee specified in Section 5036. The license plate shall be of a size, color color, and configuration determined by the department. The form of the application shall also be determined by the department.(b) A manufacturer or dealer of mopeds may operate or move a moped upon the highways during the delivery of, or during the demonstration for the sale of, the moped if the moped displays thereon a license plate or other suitable device issued to the manufacturer or dealer.SEC. 18.SEC. 22. Section 5035 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5035. Each license plate issued under Section 5033 shall bear a distinctive number to identify the moped for which it is issued and shall bear a symbol, letter, or word to distinguish license plates issued under this article from license plates issued for motorcycles and motor-driven cycles. The owner, upon being issued a license plate, shall attach it to the moped for which it is issued and shall carry the identification card issued by the department as provided in Section 4454. It shall be unlawful for any person to attach or use the license plate upon any other moped or vehicle. If the moped is destroyed, the owner shall destroy the license plate and shall within 10 days notify the department on a form approved by the department that the moped and license plate have been destroyed.If the ownership of the moped is transferred to another person, that person shall submit, within 10 days, proper application as provided in Section 5031. The license plate shall remain with the moped.SEC. 19.SEC. 23. Section 5036 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5036. A service fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid for the issuance or transfer of a special license plate for mopeds. Publicly owned mopeds are exempt from the fee.SEC. 20.SEC. 24. Section 5037 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5037. (a) A moped first sold on or after July 1, 1981, shall not be moved or operated upon a highway unless the owner first makes application for a license plate and, when received, attaches it to the moped as provided in this article.(b) Mopeds first sold prior to July 1, 1981, shall not be moved or operated upon a highway after January 1, 1982, unless the owner makes application for a license plate and, when received, attaches it to the moped as provided in this article.SEC. 21.SEC. 25. Section 5038 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5038. The department shall establish a record system that provides for identification of stolen mopeds.SEC. 22.SEC. 26. Section 5039 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5039. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no dealer, manufacturer, salesman, or representative of mopeds exclusively is required to be licensed or permitted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5.SEC. 23.SEC. 27. Section 12500 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:12500. (a) A person may not drive a motor vehicle upon a highway, unless the person then holds a valid driver’s license issued under this code, except those persons who are expressly exempted under this code.(b) A person may not drive a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped upon a highway, unless the person then holds a valid driver’s license or endorsement issued under this code for that class, except those persons who are expressly exempted under this code, or those persons specifically authorized to operate mopeds or motorized scooters with a valid driver’s license of any class, as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 12804.9.(c) A person may not drive a motor vehicle in or upon any offstreet parking facility, unless the person then holds a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class or certification to operate the vehicle. As used in this subdivision, “offstreet parking facility” means any offstreet facility held open for use by the public for parking vehicles and includes any publicly owned facilities for offstreet parking, and privately owned facilities for offstreet parking where no fee is charged for the privilege to park and which are held open for the common public use of retail customers.(d) A person may not drive a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles that is not of a type for which the person is licensed.(e) A motorized scooter operated on public streets shall at all times be equipped with an engine that complies with the applicable State Air Resources Board emission requirements.SEC. 24.SEC. 28. Section 12509 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:12509. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f) of Section 12514, the department, for good cause, may issue an instruction permit to a physically and mentally qualified person who meets one of the following requirements and who applies to the department for an instruction permit:(1) Is 15 years and 6 months of age or older, and has successfully completed approved courses in automobile driver education and driver training as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.(2) Is 15 years and 6 months of age or older, and has successfully completed an approved course in automobile driver education and is taking driver training as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.(3) Is 15 years and 6 months of age and enrolled and participating in an integrated automobile driver education and training program as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.(4) Is over 16 years of age and is applying for a restricted driver’s license pursuant to Section 12814.7.(5) Is over 17 years and 6 months of age.(b) The applicant shall qualify for, and be issued, an instruction permit within 12 months from the date of the application.(c) An instruction permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall entitle the applicant to operate a vehicle, subject to the limitations imposed by this section and any other provisions of law, upon the highways for a period not exceeding 24 months from the date of the application.(d) Except as provided in Section 12814.6, a person, while having in their immediate possession a valid permit issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of, and paragraph (5) of, subdivision (a), may operate a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, motorized scooter, or a moped, when accompanied by, and under the immediate supervision of, a California-licensed driver with a valid license of the appropriate class who is 18 years of age or over and whose driving privilege is not subject to probation. An accompanying licensed driver at all times shall occupy a position within the driver’s compartment that would enable the accompanying licensed driver to assist the person in controlling the vehicle as may be necessary to avoid a collision and to provide immediate guidance in the safe operation of the vehicle.(e) A person, while having in their immediate possession a valid permit issued pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), may only operate a government-owned motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, motorized scooter, or a moped, when taking driver training instruction administered by the California National Guard.(f) The department may also issue an instruction permit to a person who has been issued a valid driver’s license to authorize the person to obtain driver training instruction and to practice that instruction in order to obtain another class of driver’s license or an endorsement.(g) The department may further restrict permits issued under subdivision (a) as it may determine to be appropriate to ensure the safe operation of a motor vehicle by the permittee.SEC. 25.SEC. 29. Section 12509.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:12509.5. (a) A person shall obtain an instruction permit issued pursuant to this section before operating, or being issued a class M1 or M2 driver’s license to operate, a two-wheel motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, moped, or bicycle with an attached motor. The person shall meet the following requirements to obtain an instruction permit for purposes of this section:(1) If age 15 years and 6 months or older, but under the age of 18 years, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:(A) Have a valid class C license or complete driver education and training pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.(B) Successfully complete a motorcyclist safety program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.(C) Pass the motorcycle driver’s written exam.(2) If 18 years of age or older, but under 21 years of age, the applicant shall meet both of the following requirements:(A) Successfully complete a motorcyclist safety program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.(B) Pass the motorcycle driver’s written exam.(3) If 21 years of age or older, pass the motorcycle driver’s written exam.(b) A person described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) shall hold an instruction permit issued pursuant to this section for a minimum of six months before being issued a class M1 or M2 license.(c) A person issued an instruction permit pursuant to this section shall not operate a two-wheel motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, moped, or bicycle with an attached motor during the hours of darkness, shall stay off any freeways that have full control of access and have no crossings at grade, and shall not carry any passenger except an instructor licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5 or a qualified instructor as defined in Section 41907 of the Education Code.(d) An instruction permit issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period not exceeding 24 months from the date of application.(e) The department may perform, during regularly scheduled computer system maintenance and upgrades, any necessary software updates related to the changes made by the addition, during the 2009–10 Regular Session, of this section.SEC. 26.SEC. 30. Section 12804.9 of the Vehicle Code, as amended by Section 3 of Chapter 16 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:12804.9. (a) (1) The examination shall include all of the following:(A) A test of the applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the provisions of this code governing the operation of vehicles upon the highways.(B) A test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand simple English used in highway traffic and directional signs.(C) A test of the applicant’s understanding of traffic signs and signals, including the bikeway signs, markers, and traffic control devices established by the Department of Transportation.(D) An actual demonstration of the applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in operating a motor vehicle by driving it under the supervision of an examining officer. The applicant shall submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive, except that the department may waive the driving test part of the examination for any applicant who submits a license issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico if the department verifies through any acknowledged national driver record data source that there are no stops, holds, or other impediments to its issuance. The examining officer may request to see evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle before supervising the demonstration of the applicant’s ability to operate the vehicle. The examining officer may refuse to examine an applicant who is unable to provide proof of financial responsibility for the vehicle, unless proof of financial responsibility is not required by this code.(E) A test of the hearing and eyesight of the applicant, and of other matters that may be necessary to determine the mental and physical fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways, and whether any grounds exist for refusal of a license under this code.(2) (A) Before a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, may be issued or renewed, the applicant shall have in the applicant’s driver record a valid report of a medical examination of the applicant given not more than two years before the date of the application by a health care professional. As used in this paragraph, “health care professional” means a person who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with applicable state laws and regulations to practice medicine and perform physical examinations in the United States. Health care professionals are doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, physician assistants, and registered advanced practice nurses, or doctors of chiropractic who are clinically competent to perform the medical examination presently required of motor carrier drivers by the United States Department of Transportation. The report shall be on a form approved by the department. In establishing the requirements, consideration may be given to the standards presently required of motor carrier drivers by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.(B) The department may accept a federal waiver of one or more physical qualification standards if the waiver is accompanied by a report of a nonqualifying medical examination for a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, pursuant to Section 391.41(a)(3)(ii) of Subpart E of Part 391 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3) A physical defect of the applicant that, in the opinion of the department, is compensated for to ensure safe driving ability, shall not prevent the issuance of a license to the applicant.(b) In accordance with the following classifications, an applicant for a driver’s license shall be required to submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive:(1) Class A includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a combination of vehicles, if a vehicle being towed has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.(B) A vehicle towing more than one vehicle.(C) A trailer bus.(D) The operation of all vehicles under class B and class C.(2) Class B includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds.(B) A single vehicle with three or more axles, except any three-axle vehicle weighing less than 6,000 pounds.(C) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds, except a trailer bus.(D) A farm labor vehicle.(E) A single vehicle with three or more axles or a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(F) A house car over 40 feet in length, excluding safety devices and safety bumpers.(G) The operation of all vehicles covered under class C.(3) Class C includes the following:(A) A two-axle vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, including when the vehicle is towing a trailer or semitrailer with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a trailer coach not exceeding 9,000 pounds gross.(C) A house car of 40 feet in length or less.(D) A three-axle vehicle weighing 6,000 pounds gross or less.(E) A house car of 40 feet in length or less or a vehicle towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, including when a tow dolly is used. A person driving a vehicle may not tow another vehicle in violation of Section 21715.(F) (i) A two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing either a trailer coach or a fifth-wheel travel trailer not exceeding 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation.(ii) A two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a fifth-wheel travel trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds, gross vehicle weight rating, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation, and if the person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.(iii) The authority to operate combinations of vehicles under this subparagraph may be granted by endorsement on a class C license upon completion of that written examination.(G) A vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating or a gross vehicle weight rating, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (j) and (k), respectively, of Section 15210, of 26,000 pounds or less, if all of the following conditions are met:(i) Is operated by a farmer, an employee of a farmer, or an instructor credentialed in agriculture as part of an instructional program in agriculture at the high school, community college, or university level.(ii) Is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations.(iii) Is not used in the capacity of a for-hire carrier or for compensation.(H) Firefighting equipment, provided that the equipment is operated by a person who holds a firefighter endorsement pursuant to Section 12804.11.(I) A motorized scooter.(J) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, except a trailer bus.(K) Class C does not include a two-wheel motorcycle or a two-wheel motor-driven cycle.(4) Class M1. A two-wheel motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle. Authority to operate a vehicle included in a class M1 license may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination.(5) (A) Class M2 includes a moped or a bicycle with an attached motor, except an electric bicycle as described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5.(B) Authority to operate vehicles included in class M2 may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination. Persons holding a class M1 license or endorsement may operate vehicles included in class M2 without further examination.(c) A driver’s license or driver certificate is not valid for operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, any other motor vehicle listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or any other vehicle requiring a driver to hold any driver certificate or any driver’s license endorsement under Section 15275, unless a medical certificate approved by the department that has been issued within two years of the date of the operation of that vehicle and a copy of the medical examination report from which the certificate was issued is on file with the department. Otherwise, the license is valid only for operating class C vehicles that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, and for operating class M1 or M2 vehicles, if so endorsed, that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.(d) A license or driver certificate issued before the enactment of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15200) is valid to operate the class or type of vehicles specified under the law in existence before that enactment until the license or certificate expires or is otherwise suspended, revoked, or canceled. Upon application for renewal or replacement of a driver’s license, endorsement, or certificate required to operate a commercial motor vehicle, a valid medical certificate on a form approved by the department shall be submitted to the department.(e) The department may accept a certificate of driving skill that is issued by an employer, authorized by the department to issue a certificate under Section 15250, of the applicant, in lieu of a driving test, on class A or B applications, if the applicant has first qualified for a class C license and has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The certificate may be submitted as evidence of the applicant’s skill in the operation of the types of equipment covered by the license for which the applicant is applying.(f) The department may accept a certificate of competence in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, when the certificate is issued by a law enforcement agency for its officers who operate class M1 or M2 vehicles in their duties, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying.(g) The department may accept a certificate of satisfactory completion of a motorcyclist training program approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2932 in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The department shall review and approve the written and driving test used by a program to determine whether the program may issue a certificate of completion.(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person holding a valid California driver’s license of any class may operate a short-term rental moped without taking any special examination for the operation of a moped, and without having a class M2 endorsement on that license. As used in this subdivision, “short-term” means 48 hours or less.(i) A person under 21 years of age shall not be issued a class M1 or M2 license or endorsement unless the person provides evidence satisfactory to the department of completion of a novice motorcycle safety training program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.(j) A driver of a vanpool vehicle may operate with a class C license but shall possess evidence of a medical examination required for a class B license when operating vanpool vehicles. In order to be eligible to drive the vanpool vehicle, the driver shall keep in the vanpool vehicle a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the driver has not been convicted of reckless driving, drunk driving, or a hit-and-run offense in the last five years.(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 27.SEC. 31. Section 12804.9 of the Vehicle Code, as amended by Section 4 of Chapter 16 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:12804.9. (a) (1) The examination shall include all of the following:(A) A test of the applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the provisions of this code governing the operation of vehicles upon the highways.(B) A test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand simple English used in highway traffic and directional signs.(C) A test of the applicant’s understanding of traffic signs and signals, including the bikeway signs, markers, and traffic control devices established by the Department of Transportation.(D) An actual demonstration of the applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in operating a motor vehicle by driving it under the supervision of an examining officer. The applicant shall submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive, except that the department may waive the driving test part of the examination for any applicant who submits a license issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico if the department verifies through any acknowledged national driver record data source that there are no stops, holds, or other impediments to its issuance. The examining officer may request to see evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle before supervising the demonstration of the applicant’s ability to operate the vehicle. The examining officer may refuse to examine an applicant who is unable to provide proof of financial responsibility for the vehicle, unless proof of financial responsibility is not required by this code.(E) A test of the hearing and eyesight of the applicant, and of other matters that may be necessary to determine the mental and physical fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways, and whether any grounds exist for refusal of a license under this code.(2) (A) Before a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, may be issued or renewed, the applicant shall have in the applicant’s driver record a valid report of a medical examination of the applicant given not more than two years before the date of the application by a health care professional. As used in this paragraph, “health care professional” means a person who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with applicable state laws and regulations to practice medicine and perform physical examinations in the United States. Health care professionals are doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, physician assistants, and registered advanced practice nurses, or doctors of chiropractic who are clinically competent to perform the medical examination presently required of motor carrier drivers by the United States Department of Transportation. The report shall be on a form approved by the department. In establishing the requirements, consideration may be given to the standards presently required of motor carrier drivers by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.(B) The department may accept a federal waiver of one or more physical qualification standards if the waiver is accompanied by a report of a nonqualifying medical examination for a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, pursuant to Section 391.41(a)(3)(ii) of Subpart E of Part 391 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3) A physical defect of the applicant that, in the opinion of the department, is compensated for to ensure safe driving ability, shall not prevent the issuance of a license to the applicant.(b) In accordance with the following classifications, an applicant for a driver’s license shall be required to submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive:(1) Class A includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a combination of vehicles, if a vehicle being towed has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.(B) A vehicle towing more than one vehicle.(C) A trailer bus.(D) The operation of all vehicles under class B and class C.(2) Class B includes the following:(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds.(B) A single vehicle with three or more axles, except any three-axle vehicle weighing less than 6,000 pounds.(C) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds, except a trailer bus.(D) A farm labor vehicle.(E) A single vehicle with three or more axles or a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(F) A house car over 40 feet in length, excluding safety devices and safety bumpers.(G) The operation of all vehicles covered under class C.(3) Class C includes the following:(A) A two-axle vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, including when the vehicle is towing a trailer or semitrailer with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a trailer coach not exceeding 9,000 pounds gross.(C) A house car of 40 feet in length or less.(D) A three-axle vehicle weighing 6,000 pounds gross or less.(E) A house car of 40 feet in length or less or a vehicle towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, including when a tow dolly is used. A person driving a vehicle may not tow another vehicle in violation of Section 21715.(F) (i) A two-axle vehicle when towing a trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight, if all of the following conditions are met:(I) The towing of the trailer is not for compensation or commercial purposes.(II) The trailer is coupled to the towing vehicle by a bed-mounted gooseneck hitch or a fifth-wheel and kingpin connection.(III) The trailer is used exclusively for recreational purposes.(IV) The trailer is used for the transportation of property or human habitation, or both.(V) The person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.(ii) A vehicle towing a fifth-wheel travel trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds, gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation, and if the person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.(iii) The authority to operate combinations of vehicles under this subparagraph may be granted by endorsement on a class C license upon completion of that written examination.(G) A vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating or a gross vehicle weight rating, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (j) and (k), respectively, of Section 15210, of 26,000 pounds or less, if all of the following conditions are met:(i) Is operated by a farmer, an employee of a farmer, or an instructor credentialed in agriculture as part of an instructional program in agriculture at the high school, community college, or university level.(ii) Is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations.(iii) Is not used in the capacity of a for-hire carrier or for compensation.(H) Firefighting equipment, provided that the equipment is operated by a person who holds a firefighter endorsement pursuant to Section 12804.11.(I) A motorized scooter.(J) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, except a trailer bus.(K) Class C does not include a two-wheel motorcycle or a two-wheel motor-driven cycle.(4) Class M1. A two-wheel motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle. Authority to operate a vehicle included in a class M1 license may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination.(5) (A) Class M2 includes a moped or a bicycle with an attached motor, except an electric bicycle as described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5.(B) Authority to operate vehicles included in class M2 may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination. Persons holding a class M1 license or endorsement may operate vehicles included in class M2 without further examination.(c) A driver’s license or driver certificate is not valid for operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, any other motor vehicle listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or any other vehicle requiring a driver to hold any driver certificate or any driver’s license endorsement under Section 15275, unless a medical certificate approved by the department that has been issued within two years of the date of the operation of that vehicle and a copy of the medical examination report from which the certificate was issued is on file with the department. Otherwise, the license is valid only for operating class C vehicles that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, and for operating class M1 or M2 vehicles, if so endorsed, that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.(d) A license or driver certificate issued before the enactment of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15200) is valid to operate the class or type of vehicles specified under the law in existence before that enactment until the license or certificate expires or is otherwise suspended, revoked, or canceled. Upon application for renewal or replacement of a driver’s license, endorsement, or certificate required to operate a commercial motor vehicle, a valid medical certificate on a form approved by the department shall be submitted to the department.(e) The department may accept a certificate of driving skill that is issued by an employer, authorized by the department to issue a certificate under Section 15250, of the applicant, in lieu of a driving test, on class A or B applications, if the applicant has first qualified for a class C license and has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The certificate may be submitted as evidence of the applicant’s skill in the operation of the types of equipment covered by the license for which the applicant is applying.(f) The department may accept a certificate of competence in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, when the certificate is issued by a law enforcement agency for its officers who operate class M1 or M2 vehicles in their duties, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying.(g) The department may accept a certificate of satisfactory completion of a motorcyclist training program approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2932 in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The department shall review and approve the written and driving test used by a program to determine whether the program may issue a certificate of completion.(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person holding a valid California driver’s license of any class may operate a short-term rental moped without taking any special examination for the operation of a moped, and without having a class M2 endorsement on that license. As used in this subdivision, “short-term” means 48 hours or less.(i) A person under 21 years of age shall not be issued a class M1 or M2 license or endorsement unless the person provides evidence satisfactory to the department of completion of a novice motorcycle safety training program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.(j) A driver of a vanpool vehicle may operate with a class C license but shall possess evidence of a medical examination required for a class B license when operating vanpool vehicles. In order to be eligible to drive the vanpool vehicle, the driver shall keep in the vanpool vehicle a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the driver has not been convicted of reckless driving, drunk driving, or a hit-and-run offense in the last five years.(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.SEC. 28.SEC. 32. Section 12814.6 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:12814.6. (a) Except as provided in Section 12814.7, a driver’s license issued to a person at least 16 years of age but under 18 years of age shall be issued pursuant to the provisional licensing program contained in this section. The program shall consist of all of the following components:(1) Upon application for an original license, the applicant shall be issued an instruction permit pursuant to Section 12509. A person who has in their immediate possession a valid permit issued pursuant to Section 12509 may operate a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or moped, only when the person is either taking the driver training instruction referred to in paragraph (3) or practicing that instruction, provided the person is accompanied by, and is under the immediate supervision of, a California-licensed driver 25 years of age or older whose driving privilege is not on probation. The age requirement of this paragraph does not apply if the licensed driver is the parent, spouse, or guardian of the permitholder or is a licensed or certified driving instructor.(2) The person shall hold an instruction permit for not less than six months prior to applying for a provisional driver’s license.(3) The person shall have complied with one of the following:(A) Satisfactory completion of approved courses in automobile driver education and driver training maintained pursuant to provisions of the Education Code in any secondary school of California, or equivalent instruction in a secondary school of another state.(B) Satisfactory completion of an integrated driver education and training program that is approved by the department and conducted by a driving instructor licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5. The program shall utilize segmented modules, whereby a portion of the educational instruction is provided by, and then reinforced through, specific behind-the-wheel training before moving to the next phase of driver education and training. The program shall contain a minimum of 30 hours of classroom instruction and 6 hours of behind-the-wheel training.(C) Satisfactory completion of six hours or more of behind-the-wheel instruction by a driving school or an independent driving instructor licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5 and either an accredited course in automobile driver education in any secondary school of California pursuant to provisions of the Education Code or satisfactory completion of equivalent professional instruction acceptable to the department. To be acceptable to the department, the professional instruction shall meet minimum standards to be prescribed by the department, and the standards shall be at least equal to the requirements for driver education and driver training contained in the rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to the Education Code. A person who has complied with this subdivision shall not be required by the governing board of a school district to comply with subparagraph (A) in order to graduate from high school.(D) Except as provided under subparagraph (B), a student may not take driver training instruction, unless the student has successfully completed driver education.(4) The person shall complete 50 hours of supervised driving practice prior to the issuance of a provisional license, which is in addition to any other driver training instruction required by law. Not less than 10 of the required practice hours shall include driving during darkness, as defined in Section 280. Upon application for a provisional license, the person shall submit to the department the certification of a parent, spouse, guardian, or licensed or certified driving instructor that the applicant has completed the required amount of driving practice and is prepared to take the department’s driving test. A person without a parent, spouse, guardian, or who is an emancipated minor, may have a licensed driver 25 years of age or older or a licensed or certified driving instructor complete the certification. This requirement does not apply to motorcycle practice.(5) The person shall successfully complete an examination required by the department. Before retaking a test, the person shall wait for not less than one week after failure of the written test and for not less than two weeks after failure of the driving test.(b) Except as provided in Section 12814.7, the provisional driver’s license shall be subject to all of the following restrictions:(1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), during the first 12 months after issuance of a provisional license the licensee may not do any of the following unless accompanied and supervised by a licensed driver who is the licensee’s parent or guardian, a licensed driver who is 25 years of age or older, or a licensed or certified driving instructor:(A) Drive between the hours of 11 p.m. and 5 a.m.(B) Transport passengers who are under 20 years of age.(2) A licensee may drive between the hours of 11 p.m. and 5 a.m. or transport an immediate family member without being accompanied and supervised by a licensed driver who is the licensee’s parent or guardian, a licensed driver who is 25 years of age or older, or a licensed or certified driving instructor, in the following circumstances:(A) Medical necessity of the licensee when reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from a physician familiar with the condition, containing a diagnosis and probable date when sufficient recovery will have been made to terminate the necessity.(B) Schooling or school-authorized activities of the licensee when reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from the school principal, dean, or school staff member designated by the principal or dean, containing a probable date that the schooling or school-authorized activity will have been completed.(C) Employment necessity of the licensee when reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from the employer, verifying employment and containing a probable date that the employment will have been completed.(D) Necessity of the licensee or the licensee’s immediate family member when reasonable transportation facilities are inadequate and operation of a vehicle by a minor is necessary to transport the licensee or the licensee’s immediate family member. The licensee shall keep in their possession a signed statement from a parent or legal guardian verifying the reason and containing a probable date that the necessity will have ceased.(E) The licensee is an emancipated minor.(c) A law enforcement officer shall not stop a vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether the driver is in violation of the restrictions imposed under subdivision (b).(d) A law enforcement officer shall not stop a vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether a driver who is subject to the license restrictions in subdivision (b) is in violation of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 118947) of Chapter 4 of Part 15 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.(e) (1) Upon a finding that any licensee has violated paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the court shall impose one of the following:(A) Not less than 8 hours nor more than 16 hours of community service for a first offense and not less than 16 hours nor more than 24 hours of community service for a second or subsequent offense.(B) A fine of not more than thirty-five dollars ($35) for a first offense and a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for a second or subsequent offense.(2) If the court orders community service, the court shall retain jurisdiction until the hours of community service have been completed.(3) If the hours of community service have not been completed within 90 days, the court shall impose a fine of not more than thirty-five dollars ($35) for a first offense and not more than fifty dollars ($50) for a second or subsequent offense.(f) A conviction of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), when reported to the department, may not be disclosed as otherwise specified in Section 1808 or constitute a violation point count value pursuant to Section 12810.(g) Any term of restriction or suspension of the driving privilege imposed on a person pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in effect until the end of the term even though the person becomes 18 years of age before the term ends.(1) The driving privilege shall be suspended when the record of the person shows one or more notifications issued pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5. The suspension shall continue until any notification issued pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5 has been cleared.(2) A 30-day restriction shall be imposed when a driver’s record shows a violation point count of two or more points in 12 months, as determined in accordance with Section 12810. The restriction shall require the licensee to be accompanied by a licensed parent, spouse, guardian, or other licensed driver 25 years of age or older, except when operating a class M vehicle, or so licensed, with no passengers aboard.(3) A 6-month suspension of the driving privilege and a one-year term of probation shall be imposed whenever a licensee’s record shows a violation point count of three or more points in 12 months, as determined in accordance with Section 12810. The terms and conditions of probation shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:(A) The person shall violate no law that, if resulting in conviction, is reportable to the department under Section 1803.(B) The person shall remain free from accident responsibility.(h) Whenever action by the department under subdivision (g) arises as a result of a motor vehicle accident, the person may, in writing and within 10 days, demand a hearing to present evidence that they were not responsible for the accident upon which the action is based. Whenever action by the department is based upon a conviction reportable to the department under Section 1803, the person has no right to a hearing pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14100) of Chapter 3.(i) The department shall require a person whose driving privilege is suspended or revoked pursuant to subdivision (g) to submit proof of financial responsibility as defined in Section 16430. The proof of financial responsibility shall be filed on or before the date of reinstatement following the suspension or revocation. The proof of financial responsibility shall be maintained with the department for three years following the date of reinstatement.(j) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the department may issue a distinctive driver’s license, that displays a distinctive color or a distinctively colored stripe or other distinguishing characteristic, to persons at least 16 years of age and older but under 18 years of age, and to persons 18 years of age and older but under 21 years of age, so that the distinctive license feature is immediately recognizable. The features shall clearly differentiate between driver’s licenses issued to persons at least 16 years of age or older but under 18 years of age and to persons 18 years of age or older but under 21 years of age.(2) If changes in the format or appearance of driver’s licenses are adopted pursuant to this subdivision, those changes may be implemented under any new contract for the production of driver’s licenses entered into after the adoption of those changes.(k) The department shall include, on the face of the provisional driver’s license, the original issuance date of the provisional driver’s license in addition to any other issuance date.(l) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Brady-Jared Teen Driver Safety Act of 1997.SEC. 29.SEC. 33. Section 21065 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:21065. Any incident report filed by a peace officer for an injury or crash involving an electric bicycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle shall include all of the information provided in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 27850. If the electric bicycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle does not have the marking or label, the incident report shall indicate that a marking or label was not available.SEC. 30.SEC. 34. Section 21113 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21113. (a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person shall not drive a vehicle or animal, or stop, park, or leave standing a vehicle or animal, whether attended or unattended, upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or the grounds of any of the following:(A) A public school, state university, state college, or an educational institution exempted, in whole or in part, from taxation.(B) A unit of the state park system.(C) A county park.(D) A municipal airport.(E) A rapid transit district, transit development board, transit district, public transportation agency, county transportation commission created pursuant to Section 130050 of the Public Utilities Code, or a joint powers agency operating or managing a commuter rail system.(F) Any property under the direct control of the legislative body of a municipality.(G) A state, county, or hospital district institution or building.(H) Any harbor improvement district or harbor district formed pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5800) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 8 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.(I) A district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.(J) State grounds served by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.(K) Any property under the possession or control of a housing authority formed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 34240) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) The activities described in paragraph (1) may be performed with the permission of, and upon and subject to any condition or regulation that may be imposed by, the legislative body of the municipality, or the governing board or officer of the public school, state university, state college, county park, municipal airport, rapid transit district, transit development board, transit district, public transportation agency, county transportation commission, joint powers agency operating or managing a commuter rail system, or state, county, or hospital district institution or building, or educational institution, or harbor district, or a district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, or housing authority, or the Director of Parks and Recreation regarding units of the state park system or the state agency with jurisdiction over the grounds served by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.(b) A governing board, legislative body, or officer shall erect or place appropriate signs giving notice of any special conditions or regulations that are imposed under this section and the governing board, legislative body, or officer shall also prepare and keep available at the principal administrative office of the governing board, legislative body, or officer, for examination by all interested persons, a written statement of all those special conditions and regulations adopted pursuant to this section.(c) When a governing board, legislative body, or officer permits public traffic upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or grounds under their control then, except for those conditions imposed or regulations enacted by the governing board, legislative body, or officer applicable to the traffic, all the provisions of this code relating to traffic upon the highways shall be applicable to the traffic upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or grounds.(d) A public transportation agency that imposes any condition or regulation upon a person who parks or leaves standing a vehicle, pursuant to subdivision (a), is authorized to do either of the following:(1) Enforce that condition or regulation in the manner provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of this code. The public transportation agency shall be considered the issuing agency for that purpose.(2) Designate regularly employed and salaried employees, who are engaged in directing traffic or enforcing parking laws and regulations, for the purpose of removing any vehicle in the same manner as a city, county, or jurisdiction of a state agency pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22650) of Division 11 of this code.(e) With respect to the permitted use of vehicles or animals on property under the direct control of the legislative body of a municipality, no change in the use of vehicles or animals on the property, that had been permitted on January 1, 1976, shall be effective unless and until the legislative body, at a meeting open to the general public, determines that the use of vehicles or animals on the property should be prohibited or regulated.(f) A transit development board may adopt ordinances, rules, or regulations to restrict, or specify the conditions for, the use of bicycles, mopeds, electric bicycles, skateboards, electrically motorized boards, and roller skates on property under the control of, or any portion of property used by, the board.(g) A public agency, including, but not limited to, the Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University, may adopt rules or regulations to restrict, or specify the conditions for, the use of bicycles, mopeds, electric bicycles, skateboards, electrically motorized boards, and roller skates on public property under the jurisdiction of that agency.(h) “Housing authority,” for the purposes of this section, means a housing authority located within a county with a population of over 6,000,000 people, and any other housing authority that complies with the requirements of this section.(i) “Public transportation agency,” for purposes of this section, means a public agency that provides public transportation as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 1 of Article XIX A of the California Constitution or a county transportation commission created pursuant to Section 130050 of the Public Utilities Code.SEC. 31.SEC. 35. Section 21201.3 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21201.3. (a) A bicycle or moped used by a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 of, subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (i) of Section 830.2 of, subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 830.31 of, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.32 of, Section 830.33 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.36 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.4 of, or Section 830.6 of, the Penal Code, in the performance of the peace officer’s duties, may display a steady or flashing blue warning light that is visible from the front, sides, or rear of the bicycle or moped.(b) No person shall display a steady or flashing blue warning light on a bicycle or moped except as authorized under subdivision (a).SEC. 32.SEC. 36. Section 21203 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21203. No person riding upon any motorcycle, moped, bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled, or toy vehicle shall attach the same or themselves to any streetcar or vehicle on the roadway.SEC. 33.SEC. 37. Section 21207.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21207.5. (a) Notwithstanding Sections 21207 and 23127 of this code, or any other law, a moped shall not be operated on a bicycle path or trail, bikeway, bicycle lane established pursuant to Section 21207, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail, unless it is within or adjacent to a roadway or unless the local authority or the governing body of a public agency having jurisdiction over the path or trail permits, by ordinance, that operation.(b) The local authority or governing body of a public agency having jurisdiction over an equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail, may prohibit, by ordinance, the operation of an electric bicycle or any class of electric bicycle on that trail.(c) The Department of Parks and Recreation may prohibit the operation of an electric bicycle or any class of electric bicycle on any bicycle path or trail within the department’s jurisdiction.SEC. 34.SEC. 38. Section 21209 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21209. (a) No person shall drive a motor vehicle in a bicycle lane established on a roadway pursuant to Section 21207 except as follows:(1) To park where parking is permitted.(2) To enter or leave the roadway.(3) To prepare for a turn within a distance of 200 feet from the intersection.(b) This section does not prohibit the use of a moped in a bicycle lane, pursuant to Section 21207.5, at a speed no greater than is reasonable or prudent, having due regard for visibility, traffic conditions, and the condition of the roadway surface of the bicycle lane, and in a manner which does not endanger the safety of bicyclists.SEC. 35.SEC. 39. Section 21712 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21712. (a) A person driving a motor vehicle shall not knowingly permit a person to ride on a vehicle or upon a portion of a vehicle that is not designed or intended for the use of passengers.(b) A person shall not ride on a vehicle or upon a portion of a vehicle that is not designed or intended for the use of passengers.(c) A person driving a motor vehicle shall not knowingly permit a person to ride in the trunk of that motor vehicle.(d) A person shall not ride in the trunk of a motor vehicle.(e) A person violating subdivision (c) or (d) shall be punished as follows:(1) By a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).(2) For a second violation occurring within one year of a prior violation that resulted in a conviction, a fine of two hundred dollars ($200).(3) For a third or a subsequent violation occurring within one year of two or more prior violations that resulted in convictions, a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(f) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to an employee engaged in the necessary discharge of their duty or in the case of persons riding completely within or upon vehicle bodies in the space intended for a load on the vehicle.(g) A person shall not drive a motor vehicle that is towing a trailer coach, camp trailer, or trailer carrying a vessel, containing a passenger, except when a trailer carrying or designed to carry a vessel is engaged in the launching or recovery of the vessel.(h) A person shall not knowingly drive a motor vehicle that is towing a person riding upon a motorcycle, moped, bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled, skis, or toy vehicle.(i) Subdivision (g) does not apply to a trailer coach that is towed with a fifth-wheel device if the trailer coach is equipped with safety glazing materials wherever glazing materials are used in windows or doors, with an audible or visual signaling device that a passenger inside the trailer coach can use to gain the attention of the motor vehicle driver, and with at least one unobstructed exit capable of being opened from both the interior and exterior of the trailer coach.SEC. 36.SEC. 40. Section 21960 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21960. (a) The Department of Transportation and local authorities, by order, ordinance, or resolution, with respect to freeways, expressways, or designated portions thereof under their respective jurisdictions, to which vehicle access is completely or partially controlled, may prohibit or restrict the use of the freeways, expressways, or any portion thereof by pedestrians, bicycles or other nonmotorized traffic or by any person operating a motor-driven cycle, moped, motorized scooter, or electrically motorized board. A prohibition or restriction pertaining to bicycles, motor-driven cycles, motorized scooters, or electrically motorized boards shall be deemed to include mopeds. A person shall not operate a moped wherever that prohibition or restriction is in force. Notwithstanding any order, ordinance, or resolution to the contrary, the driver or passengers of a disabled vehicle stopped on a freeway or expressway may walk to the nearest exit, in either direction, on that side of the freeway or expressway upon which the vehicle is disabled, from which telephone or motor vehicle repair services are available.(b) The prohibitory regulation authorized by subdivision (a) shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon any freeway or expressway and the approaches thereto. If any portion of a county freeway or expressway is contained within the limits of a city within the county, the county may erect signs on that portion as required under this subdivision if the ordinance has been approved by the city pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1730 of the Streets and Highways Code.(c) No ordinance or resolution of local authorities shall apply to any state highway until the proposed ordinance or resolution has been presented to, and approved in writing by, the Department of Transportation.(d) An ordinance or resolution adopted under this section on or after January 1, 2005, to prohibit pedestrian access to a county freeway or expressway shall not be effective unless it is supported by a finding by the local authority that the freeway or expressway does not have pedestrian facilities and pedestrian use would pose a safety risk to the pedestrian.SEC. 37.SEC. 41. Section 22651.08 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:22651.08. (a) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may remove a vehicle located within the territorial limits in which the officer may act, under either of the following circumstances:(1) A person is operating a vehicle with fewer than four wheels that does not meet the definition of an electric bicycle set forth in Section 312.5 and is both of the following:(A) Powered by an electric motor capable of exclusively propelling the vehicle in excess of 20 miles per hour on a highway.(B) Being operated by an operator who is not licensed to operate the vehicle.(2) A person is operating a vehicle that is a class 3 electric bicycle in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 21213.(3) A person is operating an unauthorized device, pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 21310) of Chapter 1 of Division 11, on a highway or public right-of-way.(b) (1) A city, county, or city and county may adopt at a public meeting a regulation, ordinance, or resolution imposing charges equal to its administrative costs relating to the removal, seizure, and storage costs. The charges shall not exceed the actual costs incurred for the expenses directly related to removing, seizing, and storing the vehicle.(2) A local jurisdiction that has adopted a regulation, ordinance, or resolution pursuant to paragraph (1) shall publicly and conspicuously post the schedule of charges on their internet website.(c) An agency shall release a seized vehicle to the owner, violator, or their agent after a minimum of 48 hours, if both of the following conditions are met:(1) The owner, violator, or authorized agent’s request is made during normal business hours.(2) The applicable removal, seizure, and storage costs have been paid.(d) If a peace officer removes a vehicle pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), an agency may, as a condition of release, require the owner, violator, or the parent or legal guardian of the owner or violator to deliver proof that the violator has completed an electric bicycle safety and training program, as described in Section 894 of the Streets and Highways Code, or a related local bicycle safety course, if one is available, as prescribed by authorities in the local jurisdiction.SEC. 38.SEC. 42. Section 23135 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:23135. (a)It is unlawful for any person to operate upon a highway any vehicle which was originally manufactured as a moped, as defined in Section 406, and which has been modified in such a manner that it no longer conforms to the definition of a moped.(b)(1)Notwithstanding moped. Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not operate a two-wheeled or three-wheeled device powered by an electric motor that is capable of propelling the device at a speed greater than 20 miles per hour on level ground on a highway or public right-of-way when powered solely by the motor unless the device meets a definition of a class of motor vehicle device that is explicitly defined in Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), complies with all applicable requirements for that motor vehicle, and is explicitly authorized for use on a highway or public right-of-way pursuant to this code.(2)A code. A vehicle described in paragraph (1) this section includes, without limitation, any device that has multiple speed modes or settings, notwithstanding that one or more of the settings limit the maximum speed of the device to 20 miles per hour when powered solely by the motor, and devices that are designed or designated by the manufacturer for off-road use or for use on private land.SEC. 39.SEC. 43. Section 23330 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:23330. Except where a special permit has been obtained from the Department of Transportation under the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 35780) of Chapter 5 of Division 15, none of the following shall be permitted on any vehicular crossing:(a) Animals while being led or driven, even though tethered or harnessed.(b) Bicycles, mopeds, or motorized scooters, unless the department by signs indicates that bicycles, mopeds, or motorized scooters, or any combination thereof, are permitted upon all or any portion of the vehicular crossing.(c) Vehicles having a total width of vehicle or load exceeding 102 inches.(d) Vehicles carrying items prohibited by regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation.SEC. 40.SEC. 44. Section 24015 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:24015. (a) Mopeds shall comply with those federal motor vehicle safety standards established pursuant to Chapter 301 (commencing with Section 30101) of Part A of Subtitle VI of Title 49 of the United States Code that apply to a motor-driven cycle, as that term is defined in regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions. These standards include, but are not limited to, provisions requiring a headlamp, taillamp, stoplamp, side and rear reflex reflectors, and adequate brakes.(b) In addition to equipment required in subdivision (a), all mopeds operated upon a highway shall be equipped with a mirror as required in subdivision (a) of Section 26709, a horn as required in Section 27000, and mopeds powered by a liquid fuel shall be equipped with an adequate muffler as required in subdivision (a) of Section 27150.(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), none of the provisions of this chapter relating to motorcycles and motor-driven cycles, as defined in this code, shall apply to a moped.SEC. 41.SEC. 45. Section 24951 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:24951. (a) Any vehicle may be equipped with a lamp-type turn signal system capable of clearly indicating any intention to turn either to the right or to the left.(b) The following vehicles shall be equipped with a lamp-type turn signal system meeting the requirements of this chapter.(1) Motortrucks, truck tractors, buses and passenger vehicles, other than motorcycles, manufactured and first registered on or after January 1, 1958.(2) Trailers and semitrailers manufactured and first registered between December 31, 1957, and January 1, 1969, having a gross weight of 6,000 pounds or more.(3) Trailers and semitrailers 80 or more inches in width manufactured on or after January 1, 1969.(4) Motorcycles manufactured and first registered on or after January 1, 1973.(5) Motor-driven cycles and mopeds propelled by an electric motor and manufactured after January 1, 2027.The requirements of this subdivision shall not apply to special mobile equipment, or auxiliary dollies.(c) Turn signal lamps on vehicles manufactured on or after January 1, 1969, shall be mounted not lower than 15 inches.SEC. 42.SEC. 46. Section 25650 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:25650. Every motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, and moped during darkness shall be equipped with at least one and not more than two lighted headlamps which shall conform to the requirements and limitations of this division.SEC. 43.SEC. 47. Section 27800 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:27800. It is unlawful for a driver of a motorcycle or a moped to carry any other person thereon, except on a seat securely fastened to the machine at the rear of the driver and provided with footrests, or in a sidecar attached to a motorcycle and designed for the purpose of carrying a passenger. Every passenger on a motorcycle or a moped shall keep their feet on the footrests while such vehicle is in motion.SEC. 44.SEC. 48. Section 27802 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:27802. (a) The department may adopt reasonable regulations establishing specifications and standards for safety helmets offered for sale, or sold, for use by drivers and passengers of motorcycles and mopeds as it determines are necessary for the safety of those drivers and passengers. The regulations shall include, but are not limited to, the requirements imposed by Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 218 (49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.218) and may include compliance with that federal standard by incorporation of its requirements by reference. Each helmet sold or offered for sale for use by drivers and passengers of motorcycles and mopeds shall be conspicuously labeled in accordance with the federal standard which shall constitute the manufacturer’s certification that the helmet conforms to the applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.(b) No person shall sell, or offer for sale, for use by a driver or passenger of a motorcycle or moped any safety helmet which is not of a type meeting requirements established by the department.SEC. 45.SEC. 49. Section 27803 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:27803. (a) A driver and any passenger shall wear a safety helmet meeting requirements established pursuant to Section 27802 when riding on a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped.(b) It is unlawful to operate a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped if the driver or any passenger is not wearing a safety helmet as required by subdivision (a).(c) It is unlawful to ride as a passenger on a motorcycle, motor-driven cycles, or moped if the driver or any passenger is not wearing a safety helmet as required by subdivision (a).(d) This section applies to persons who are riding on motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, or mopeds operated on the highways.(e) For the purposes of this section, “wear a safety helmet” or “wearing a safety helmet” means having a safety helmet meeting the requirements of Section 27802 on the person’s head that is fastened with the helmet straps and that is of a size that fits the wearing person’s head securely without excessive lateral or vertical movement.(f) This section does not apply to a person operating, or riding as a passenger in, a fully enclosed three-wheeled motor vehicle that is not less than seven feet in length and not less than four feet in width, and has an unladen weight of 900 pounds or more, if the vehicle meets or exceeds all of the requirements of this code, the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, and the rules and regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation and the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.(g) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that all persons are provided with an additional safety benefit while operating or riding a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or mopeds.SEC. 46.SEC. 50. Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 27850) is added to Chapter 5 of Division 12 of the Vehicle Code, to read: Article 7.5. Electric Modes of Transportation27850. (a) Manufacturers and distributors of electric bicycles shall securely affix the following information on or to the frame or fork of each electric bicycle, subject to the specifications described in subdivision (c):(1) The name of the brand.(2) The manufacturer, importer, or distributor of the electric bicycle.(3) The classification number of the electric bicycle.(4) The top assisted speed and motor wattage of the electric bicycle.(b) Manufacturers and distributors of mopeds and motor-driven cycles shall securely affix the following information on or to the frame or fork of each moped or motor-driven cycle, subject to the specifications described in subdivision (c): a certification label that conforms to Part 567 (commencing with Section 567.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations on or to the permanent member of the vehicle as close as is practicable to the intersection of the steering post with the handle bars in a location such that it is easily readable without moving any part of the vehicle except its steering system.(1)The name of the brand.(2)The manufacturer, importer, or distributor of the moped or motor-driven cycle.(3)The word “moped” or “motor-driven cycle.”(4)The top assisted speed and motor wattage, if applicable, of the moped or motor-driven cycle.(c) The information required by subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be permanently affixed on or to the electric bicycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle, by means of a marking or labeling that is readily visible without inverting the electric bicycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle, and that cannot be removed without the marking or labeling being defaced or destroyed. The information shall be printed in Arial font in at least 9-point type. type or lettered in block capitals and numerals not less than four millimeters high.(d) (1) A person shall not sell or install an electric bicycle classification label unless the classification label is sold and installed in a physical retailer or bicycle repair shop.(2) A retailer and bicycle repair shop of electric bicycles shall verify that the classification label matches the electric bicycle class, pursuant to Section 312.5, before installing the classification label on an electric bicycle.27851. Every manufacturer, importer, or seller of a motor-driven cycle, a moped, or an off-highway electric motorcycle that is powered by an electric motor shall provide a disclosure to all potential buyers in any advertising, including any online advertising on internet websites or social media, that advises buyers that the vehicle is a motor vehicle subject to registration, their existing insurance policies may not provide coverage for the vehicle, and that they should contact their insurance company or insurance agent to determine if coverage is provided.(a) (1) A written disclosure shall be provided to the buyer and printed in not less than 14-point boldface type on a single sheet of paper that contains no information other than the statement specified in subdivision (d).(2) Any disclosure provided through online advertising or on a website offering the vehicle for sale shall be in a font size no smaller than the largest font size used in such advertising or website content and require the buyer to affirmatively acknowledge having had the opportunity to read the disclosure before completing the purchase.(b) The disclosure shall include the following language in capital letters:“THIS VEHICLE IS A MOTOR VEHICLE AND SUBJECT TO APPLICABLE MOTOR VEHICLE LAWS INCLUDING USE OF A DOT-APPROVED MOTORCYCLE HELMET, REGISTRATION, OPERATOR LICENSE, AND INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS IF USED ON A HIGHWAY. YOUR INSURANCE POLICIES MAY NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR CRASHES INVOLVING THE USE OF THIS VEHICLE. TO DETERMINE IF COVERAGE IS PROVIDED, YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY OR AGENT.”(c)In addition to any penalties imposed under this code, a violation of the disclosure requirements described in this section by a manufacturer, importer, or seller of a motor-driven cycle, moped, or electric off-road motorcycle shall constitute a misleading statement pursuant to Sections 17200 and 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.27852. It is unlawful for a person to sell an electric bicycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle in violation of the labeling and disclosure requirements of Sections 27850 and 27851.SEC. 47.SEC. 51. Section 38012 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38012. (a) As used in this division, “off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification” means a motor vehicle subject to subdivision (a) of Section 38010.(b) As used in this division, “off-highway motor vehicle” includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) A moped, motorcycle, or motor-driven cycle, except for any motorcycle that is eligible for a special transportation identification device issued pursuant to Section 38088.(2) A snowmobile or other vehicle designed to travel over snow or ice, as defined in Section 557.(3) A motor vehicle commonly referred to as a sand buggy, dune buggy, or all-terrain vehicle.(4) A motor vehicle commonly referred to as a jeep.(5) A recreational off-highway vehicle as defined in Section 500.(6) An off-highway electric motorcycle as defined in Section 436.1.SEC. 48.SEC. 52. Section 38366 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38366. (a) Notwithstanding Section 4442 of the Public Resources Code, and except for vehicles with mufflers as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 27150) of Chapter 5 of Division 12, no person shall use, operate, or allow to be used or operated, any off-highway motor vehicle, as defined in Section 38006, on any forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land unless the vehicle is equipped with a spark arrester maintained in effective working order.(b) A spark arrester affixed to the exhaust system of a vehicle subject to this section shall not be placed or mounted in such a manner as to allow flames or heat from the exhaust system to ignite any flammable material.(c) A spark arrester is a device constructed of nonflammable materials specifically for the purpose of removing and retaining carbon and other flammable particles over 0.0232 of an inch in size from the exhaust flow of an internal combustion engine or which is qualified and rated by the United States Forest Service.(d) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to an off-highway electric motorcycle or to any vehicle being operated off the highway in an organized racing or competitive event upon a closed course, which is conducted under the auspices of a recognized sanctioning body and by permit issued by the fire protection authority having jurisdiction.(e) A person shall not use, operate, or allow to be used or operated, any off-highway electric motorcycle, or any motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped powered by an electric motor, on any forest-covered land, brush-covered land, or grass-covered land unless the vehicle has been certified by its manufacturer for compliance with SAE J2929 or another applicable SAE, ISO, UNECE, or IEC electrical safety standard and the name of the manufacturer and the test standard used are permanently marked on the vehicle or on its drive system. complies with the standards for mopeds and off-highway electric motorcycles provided in Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 49.SEC. 53. Section 38505 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38505. A person shall not operate, ride, or be otherwise propelled on an all-terrain vehicle on public lands, as described in Section 38001, unless the person wears a safety helmet meeting requirements established for motorcycles and mopeds, pursuant to Section 27802.SEC. 50.SEC. 54. Section 38601 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38601. A person shall not operate, or allow a passenger in, a recreational off-highway vehicle on public lands, as described in Section 38001, unless the person and the passenger are wearing safety helmets meeting the requirements established for motorcycles and mopeds pursuant to Section 27802.SEC. 51.SEC. 55. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.